Tennessee statutes. Title 2 Elections
Chapter 16 Members of Congress
VTD: Memphis 95-7

VTD: Memphis 96-01

VTD: Millington 1

VTD: Millington 2

VTD: Morning Sun 01

Blocks (021010): 1053 1054 1055 1056 1057 1058 1059 1076 1077 1079 1080 1081 1082 1083 1084 1085 1086 1087 1088 1089 1090 1091 1092 1093 1094 1095 1096 1097 1098 1099 1100 1101 1104 1105 1106 1107 1108 1109 1110 1111 1112 1113 1114 1115 1116 1120 1125 1126 1127 1128 2031 2032 2033 2034 2035 2036 2037 2038 2039 2040 2041 2042 2043 2044 2045 2046 2047 2048 2049 2050 2051 2052 2053 2054 2063 2064 2065 2066 2067 2068 2069 2070 2071 2072 2073 2074 2075 2076 2077

VTD: Ross Store 01

VTD: Ross Store 05

VTD: Ross Store 13

VTD: Ross Store 14

VTD: Ross Store 16

VTD: Stewartville

Blocks (020222): 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1013 1015 1016 1038

Blocks (020400): 2032

VTD: Woodstock 2

It is the legislative intent that all congressional districts be contiguous and contiguity by water is sufficient, and, toward that end, if any voting district or other geographical entity designated as a portion of a district is found to be noncontiguous with the larger portion of such district, it shall be constituted a portion of the district smallest in population to which it is contiguous.

Acts 1972, ch. 733, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1603; Acts 1981, ch. 528, § 1; 1992, ch. 885, § 1; 2002, ch. 467, § 1; 2012, ch. 512, § 1.

Law Reviews.

The Origins and Constitutionality of State Unit Voting in the Electoral College, 54 Vand. L. Rev. 2099 (2001).